Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.210

Correctional facilities construction and repair—Findings.

The legislature recognizes that fair and open competition is a basic tenet of public works procurement, that such competition reduces the appearance of and opportunity for favoritism and inspires public confidence that contracts are awarded equitably and economically, and that effective monitoring mechanisms are important means of curbing any improprieties and establishing public confidence in the process by which contractual services are procured. The legislature finds that there will continue to exist a need for additional correctional facilities due to the inadequate capacity of existing correctional facilities to accommodate the predicted growth of offender populations and that it is necessary to provide public works contract options for the effective construction and repair of additional department of corrections facilities.

[ 1994 c 80 s 1; 1991 c 130 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1994 c 80: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1994 c 80 s 4.]

Effective date—1994 c 80: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 23, 1994]." [ 1994 c 80 s 5.]

Severability—1991 c 130: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1991 c 130 s 4.]